Wyoming, session 2025, HB0273.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) Pregnancy centers have a considerable and
growing life-affirming impact on the women, men, children
and communities that they serve;

(ii) Pregnancy centers serve women in Wyoming
and across the United States with integrity and compassion;

(iii) Pregnancy centers provide comprehensive
care to women and men facing unexpected pregnancies,
including resources to meet their physical, psychological,
emotional and spiritual needs;

(iv) Pregnancy centers offer women free,
confidential and compassionate services, including
pregnancy tests, peer counseling, twenty-four (24) hour
telephone hotlines, childbirth and parenting classes,
referrals to community health care, adoption referrals and
other support services;

(v) Many medical pregnancy centers offer
ultrasounds and other medical services;
HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553

(vi) Pregnancy centers encourage women to make
positive life choices by equipping them with complete and
accurate information regarding their pregnancy options and
the development of their unborn children;

(vii) Pregnancy centers provide important
support and resources for women who choose childbirth over
abortion;

(viii) Pregnancy centers have faced
unprecedented attacks since the United States Supreme
Court's decision in Dobbs v. Jackson Women's Health
Organization, which overturned Roe v. Wade and the federal
constitutional right to abortion;

(ix) Since 2022, at least one-third (1/3) of the
states have introduced legislation seeking to undermine
pregnancy centers' freedom of speech and association, or
legislation to interfere with their hiring and staffing
decisions, while numerous municipalities have considered
similar ordinances.

HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
Section 2. W.S. 1-39-124 and 35-4-1101 through
35-4-1104 are created to read:

1-39-124. Liability; Pregnancy centers.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 35-4-1103, in accordance with W.S.
35-4-1104(a).

ARTICLE 11
PREGNANCY CENTERS – PROTECTION

35-4-1101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
Pregnancy Center Autonomy and Rights of Expression (CARE)
Act."

35-4-1102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
(i) "Abortion" means the act of using or
prescribing any instrument, medicine, drug or any other
substance, device or means with the intent to terminate the
clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman and for the
purpose of ensuring the death of the unborn child.
"Abortion" shall not include any use, prescription or means
specified in this paragraph if the use, prescription or
means are done with the intent to:

(A) Save the life or preserve the health of
the unborn child;

(B) Remove a dead unborn child caused by
miscarriage;

(C) Remove an ectopic pregnancy; or

(D) Perform a pre-viability separation
procedure when the procedure is, based on reasonable
medical judgment, necessary to save the life of or prevent
serious physical injury to the pregnant woman.

HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
(ii) "Abortion-inducing drug" means any
medicine, drug or any other substance prescribed or
dispensed with the intent of terminating the clinically
diagnosable pregnancy of a woman and for the purpose of
ensuring the death of an unborn child. "Abortion-inducing
drug" includes the off-label use of drugs known to have
abortion-inducing properties that are prescribed
specifically with the intent of causing an abortion.
"Abortion-inducing drug" does not include drugs that may be
known to cause an abortion but are prescribed for other
medical indications;

(iii) "Contraception" means the use of any
natural or artificial means to prevent the fertilization of
a human ovum;

(iv) "Ectopic pregnancy" means the state of
carrying an unborn child outside of the uterine cavity;

(v) "Miscarriage" means a spontaneous loss of an
unborn child;

HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
(vi) "Pregnancy center" means a private
nonprofit organization that promotes childbirth and
alternatives to abortion and provides women, children and
families with resources, counseling, classes, referrals and
information related to pregnancy, childbearing, adoption
and parenting. A medical pregnancy center may provide
medical testing, counseling and pregnancy-related care;

(vii) "Pre-viability separation procedure" means
a medical procedure performed by a licensed physician to
remove an unborn child from the mother's uterine cavity
before that stage of fetal development when, in the
physician's reasonable medical judgment based on the
particular facts of the case and in light of the most
advanced medical technology and information available,
there is a reasonable likelihood of sustained survival of
the unborn child outside the body of the child's mother,
with or without artificial support. "Pre-viability
separation procedure" does not include an abortion;

(viii) "This act" means W.S. 35-4-1101 through
35-4-1104.

HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
35-4-1103. Interference with pregnancy centers
prohibited.

(a) The state and any of its political subdivisions,
counties, cities, towns, special districts and agencies
shall not, through the adoption or enactment of any law,
ordinance, resolution, policy or similar measure:

(i) Require a pregnancy center to offer or
perform abortions;

(ii) Require a pregnancy center to offer,
provide or distribute abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;

(iii) Require a pregnancy center to refer any
person for abortion, an abortion-inducing drug or
contraception;

(iv) Require a pregnancy center to counsel in
favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;

HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
(v) Require a pregnancy center to post any
advertisement, sign, flyer or other similar material that
promotes or provides any information that promotes or
provides information about obtaining an abortion,
abortion-inducing drugs or contraception;

(vi) Prohibit a pregnancy center from providing
information, care, counseling, classes or other services
related to pregnancy, childbirth or parenting because the
pregnancy center does not perform, refer or counsel in
favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;

(vii) Prohibit a pregnancy center from providing
prenatal and postnatal resources, including diapers, baby
clothes, baby furniture, formula and similar items because
the pregnancy center does not perform, refer or counsel in
favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;

(viii) Prohibit a medical pregnancy center from
providing medical testing, counseling and care related to
pregnancy or childbirth because the pregnancy center does
HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
not perform, refer or counsel in favor of abortion,
abortion-inducing drugs or contraception;

(ix) Prohibit a medical pregnancy center from
counseling a woman on any pregnancy-related care or
treatment, including care or treatment that may reverse the
effects of abortion-inducing drugs;

(x) Interfere with the pregnancy center's
staffing or hiring decisions by requiring the center to
interview, hire or continue to employ any person who does
not affirm the center's mission statement or agree to
comply with the center's pro-life ethic and operating
procedure.

35-4-1104. Legal remedies; right of intervention.

(a) A pregnancy center or any person aggrieved by a
violation of this act may commence a civil action for
damages, declaratory relief, injunctive relief and any
other appropriate relief. A person prevailing in an action
under this subsection shall be entitled to recover an
amount equal to three (3) times the actual damages
HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
sustained. Recovery under this subsection shall be not less
than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and shall include
all costs and reasonable attorney fees. For purposes of
this subsection, damages shall be cumulative and shall in
no way be limited by any other remedies that may be
available under any other federal, state or municipal law.

(b) By legislative order, the legislature may appoint
one (1) or more members to intervene as a matter of right
in any case in which the constitutionality or legality of
this act is challenged.

Section 3. W.S. 1-39-104(a) is amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112, and 1-39-122 and 1-39-123
through 1-39-124. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
HB0273

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0553
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0273